ani_adjectives.twol
Alphabet
    %{pl%}:0 
    >:>
    е и а о у
    е:0 и:0 а:0 о:0 у:0;

Sets
    Vowels = е и а о у;

Rules

"Plural -ol removes stem final vowel"
Vowels:0 <=> _ >:> %{pl%}:0;

"Remove %{pl%}"
%{pl%}:0 <=> _ ;
